California, session 20252026, AB1766.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 33546.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:33546.5. (a) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school serving pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.(b) When the “Health Education Framework for California Public Schools” (health framework) is next revised, on or after January 1, 2027, the commission shall consider including recommendations on the following topics:(1) (A) Local educational agencies providing annual, developmentally appropriate lessons for each grade served by the local educational agency that cover, at a minimum, all of the following topics: (i) How to prevent human trafficking, including understanding online exploitation and how traffickers target vulnerabilities, and how to prevent exploitation for labor or services, with instructional materials addressing both community-based and intrafamilial exploitation risks. (ii) How to stay safe from sexually exploitative materials and deepfakes online, including information on reporting processes and pupil rights, and foundational digital citizenship skills that equip pupils to respond safely when exposed to harmful or uncomfortable online content. (iii) Skills-based content that builds protective factors, such as help-seeking strategies, healthy boundaries, digital citizenship, rights of workers, and identifying trustworthy adults, and supports early disclosures through predictable, developmentally appropriate safety routines aligned with mandated reporting expectations. (B) The recommendations related to the lessons described in subparagraph (A) shall meet both of the following criteria:(i) Follow a cumulative, age-appropriate progression from kindergarten to grades 1 to 12, inclusive, ensuring foundational safety skills are taught in early grades and expanded upon in later grades. For pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, recommended instruction shall be nongraphic and developmentally aligned, introducing concepts of healthy touch, bodily autonomy, safe versus unsafe secrets, how to say “no,” how to seek help from trusted adults, and basic online safety in an age-appropriate manner. The recommendations shall ensure that universal safety concepts provided in early grades, such as bodily autonomy, boundary setting, and how to access help, remain developmentally appropriate and consistent with statewide child abuse prevention standards, especially for pupils at heightened risk of intrafamilial exploitation. (ii) Be evidence-based, survivor informed, culturally responsive, and aligned with trauma responsive best practices. (C) The recommendations required pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be grounded in research-supported prevention models and may include curriculum developed by community-based organizations with demonstrated evidence of effectiveness, including those using survivor-informed and culturally responsive frameworks. Recommended instruction shall be designed to gradually introduce concepts tied to exploitation prevention, ensuring age-appropriateness for younger pupils and increasing complexity at developmentally suitable stages. (D) Instruction that is recommended pursuant to this paragraph shall be consistent with the instructional quality standards established under Section 51900.5 and shall meet all of the following criteria: (i) Reinforce prevention-focused content required under the California Healthy Youth Act (Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 51930)). (ii) Promote cultural competency, including content relevant to disproportionately impacted communities. (iii) Be designed to reduce stigma for survivors and pupils with applicable lived experience. (iv) Ensure that instructional materials reflect a developmental sequence that builds knowledge year to year supporting healthy relationship education, online safety skills, and the ability of pupils to recognize and report concerning behaviors. (2) (A) Local educational agencies providing at least three staff members with annual evidence-based, survivor-informed, culturally responsive, and trauma-informed training related to the content described in this section. The recommended training content shall be consistent with state and federal best practices and shall include information about all of the following topics: (i) Identifying pupils who may be victims of human trafficking or online exploitation, including recognizing indicators of forced labor and intrafamilial abuse across developmental stages. (ii) Responding using trauma-responsive, survivor-informed protocols. (iii) Mandatory reporting responsibilities and referral pathways. (iv) How to engage culturally and linguistically diverse pupils safely. (v) How to avoid criminalization of pupils who may be exploited. (vi) Understanding how disclosures occur differently across ages and how to support early, developmentally appropriate reporting pathways. (B) For purposes of the recommendations related to a local educational agency providing at least three staff members with training pursuant to subparagraph (A), at least two staff members shall be recommended to be school counselors, school nurses, school social workers, or school psychologists, and at least one staff member shall be recommended to be a certified classroom teacher. (C) The training curriculum recommended to satisfy the requirements of this paragraph shall be curriculum produced by qualified organizations with demonstrated expertise in evidence-based human trafficking prevention education, including using survivor leadership in curriculum development.